Louisiana, session 2026, SB19.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:463.142(A), (B), and (E) are hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
§463.142. Special prestige license plate; "State Employee Retired RSEA"
A. The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall
establish a special prestige motor vehicle license plate to be known as the "State
Employee Retired RSEA" plate, provided there is a minimum of one thousand
applicants for such plates. These license plates shall be restricted to use on passenger
cars, pickup trucks, recreational vehicles, and vans.
B. The special prestige license plate shall be known as the "State Employee
Retired RSEA" license plate and shall bear the likeness of the shape of the state of
Louisiana centered on the left side of the license plate and shall display the state seal
centered inside of the outline of the state shape. The words word "State Employee
Retired RSEA" shall be centered under the "Louisiana" name logo at the top of the
plate. The center of the plate shall display a number, with the first issued plate
displaying the number one and shall continue in consecutive numerical order for
each plate. Centered at the bottom of the plate below the number shall be the words
"Louisiana State Employees Retirement System" the RSEA logo.
* * *
E. The monies received from the additional twenty-five dollar fee shall be
annually disbursed to the Louisiana State Employees Retirement System and used
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 19 ENROLLED
solely for the purpose of paying down a portion of the state's unfunded liability
obligation RSEA Foundation, Inc.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.